Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-311
Occupation taxes; disposition;
monthly report of Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State
shall make a report monthly to the Tax Commissioner of the occupation
taxes collected under sections 21-301 to 21-330
and remit them to the State Treasurer for credit to the General
Fund. The report shall include the amount of any refunds paid out under section
21-328.

Laws 1913, c. 240, § 11, p. 750;

R.S.1913, § 771;

C.S.1922, § 689;

C.S.1929, § 24-1711;

R.S.1943, § 21-311;

Laws 1984, LB 799, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 524, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 244.